Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 6. Law Enforcement Officers Training Program

§ 45-6-1.
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that the administration of criminal justice is of statewide concern, and that the activities of law enforcement officers are important to the health, safety and welfare of the people of this state and are of such nature as to require selection, education and training of a professional nature upon entrance and during the careers of law enforcement officers. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the coordination of training programs for law enforcement officers and to set standards therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 45-6-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Commission” means the Criminal Justice Planning Commission.

“Board” means the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training.

“Law enforcement officer” means any person appointed or employed full time by the state or any political subdivision thereof, or by the state military department as provided in Section 33-1-33, who is duly sworn and vested with authority to bear arms and make arrests, and whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime, the apprehension of criminals and the enforcement of the criminal and traffic laws of this state and/or the ordinances of any political subdivision thereof. The term “law enforcement officer” also includes employees of the Department of Corrections who are designated as law enforcement officers by the Commissioner of Corrections pursuant to Section 47-5-54, and includes those district attorney criminal investigators who are designated as law enforcement officers. However, the term “law enforcement officer” shall not mean or include any elected official or any person employed as a legal assistant to a district attorney in this state, compliance agents of the State Board of Pharmacy, or any person or elected official who, subject to approval by the board, provides some criminal justice related services for a law enforcement agency. As used in this paragraph, “appointed or employed full time” means any person who is receiving gross compensation for his duties as a law enforcement officer of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) or more per week or One Thousand Seventy-five Dollars ($1,075.00) or more per month.

“Part-time law enforcement officer” shall mean any person appointed or employed in a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity by the state or any political subdivision thereof who is duly sworn and vested with authority to bear arms and make arrests, and whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime, the apprehension of criminals and the enforcement of the criminal and traffic laws of this state or the ordinances of any political subdivision thereof. However, the term “part-time law enforcement officer” shall not mean or include any person or elected official who, subject to approval by the board, provides some criminal justice related services for a law enforcement agency. As used in this paragraph, “appointed or employed” means any person who is performing such duties at any time whether or not they receive any compensation for duties as a law enforcement officer provided that such compensation is less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per week or One Thousand Seventy-five Dollars ($1,075.00) per month.

“Law enforcement trainee” shall mean any person appointed or employed in a full-time, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity by the state or any political subdivision thereof for the purposes of completing all the selection and training requirements established by the board to become a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer. Such individuals shall not have the authority to use force, bear arms, make arrests or exercise any of the powers of a peace officer unless:

The trainee is under the direct control and supervision of a law enforcement officer;

The trainee was previously certified under this chapter; or

The trainee is a certified law enforcement officer in a reciprocating state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 531, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 416, § 29; Laws, 1996, ch. 422, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 510, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-6-5.
Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training created; appointment, terms of office, removal from office and compensation of members; officers; meetings; reports; advisors.

There is hereby created the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training, which shall consist of thirteen (13) members.

The Governor shall appoint six (6) members of the board from the following specified categories:

Two (2) members, each of whom is a chief of police of a municipality in this state, with one (1) of the appointees being appointed from a municipality having a population of less than five thousand (5,000) according to the latest federal decennial census.

One (1) member who is a sheriff in this state.

One (1) member who is a district attorney in this state.

One (1) member who is a representative of higher education and who has a degree in one (1) of the following areas of study: corrections, criminal justice or public administration.

One (1) member who is a nonsupervisory rank-and-file law enforcement officer.

The initial appointments to the board shall be made by the Governor no later than twenty (20) days after April 7, 1981, as follows: the chief of police and the representative of higher education each shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and the sheriff and the district attorney each shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial appointees to the board, each subsequent appointment shall be made for a term of three (3) years, beginning on the date of the expiration of the previous term. A vacancy in any appointed position on the board prior to the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor only for the balance of the unexpired term. Appointments shall be made within sixty (60) days of the occurrence of the vacancy.

Any member appointed under this subsection who fails to attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the board shall be subject to removal by the Governor. The president of the board shall notify the Governor in writing when a member has failed to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings.

The remaining seven (7) members of the board shall be the following:

The Attorney General, or his designee.

The Director of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, or his designee.

The President of the Mississippi Municipal Association, or his designee who is a member of the association.

The President of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or his designee who is a member of the association.

The President of the Mississippi Constable Association, or his designee who is a member of the association.

The President of the Mississippi Campus Law Enforcement Officers Association, or his designee who is a member of the association.

The President of the Mississippi Sheriffs’ Association, or his designee who is a member of the association.

The Attorney General, the Director of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol and the respective presidents of the foregoing associations, or their designees, shall serve only for their respective terms of office.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual and reasonable expenses incurred as a necessary incident to such service, including mileage, as provided in Section 25-3-41.

There shall be a chairman and a vice chairman of the board, elected by and from the membership of the board. The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business, but the board shall meet at least every three (3) months.

The Governor shall call an organizational meeting of the board not later than thirty (30) days after April 7, 1981.

If a person appointed to the board no longer occupies the status qualifying that person’s appointment, that position on the board shall be immediately vacated and filled ex officio or by appointment of the Governor as otherwise provided in this section.

The board shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on its activities, and may make such other reports as it deems desirable.

The training officers of all police academies in the state whose curricula are approved by the board shall be advisors to the board. They shall be entitled to all privileges of the board members, including travel expenses and subsistence, but shall not be eligible to vote at board meetings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 480, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 515, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 45-6-7.
Powers of board.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the board elsewhere in this chapter, the board shall have power to:

Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by law enforcement agencies of the state and its political subdivisions.

Establish minimum educational and training standards for admission to employment or appointment as a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer: (i) in a permanent position; and (ii) in a probationary status. The minimum educational and training standards for any law enforcement officer assigned to field or investigative duties shall include at least two (2) hours of training related to handling complaints of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children as defined in Section 43-21-105, communicating with such victims, and requiring the officer to contact the Department of Child Protection Services when human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation is suspected.

Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this chapter to be law enforcement officers or part-time law enforcement officers.

Revoke certification for cause and in the manner provided in this chapter. The board is authorized to subpoena documents regarding revocations. The board shall maintain a current list of all persons certified under this chapter who have been placed on probation, suspended, subjected to revocation of certification, or any combination of these.

Establish minimum curriculum requirements for basic and advanced courses and programs for schools operated by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training police and other law enforcement officers, both full- and part-time, which shall include a minimum of two (2) hours of training in a course or courses related to the identification of and support for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation.

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, state agencies, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, community and junior colleges and other institutions concerning the development of training schools, programs or courses of instruction for personnel defined in this chapter.

Make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview pursuant to this chapter.

Make such inspection and evaluation as may be necessary to determine if governmental units are complying with the provisions of this chapter.

Approve law enforcement officer training schools for operation by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training personnel defined in this chapter.

Upon the request of agencies employing personnel defined in this chapter, conduct surveys or aid municipalities and counties to conduct surveys through qualified public or private agencies and assist in the implementation of any recommendations resulting from such surveys.

Upon request of agencies within the purview of this chapter, conduct general and specific management surveys and studies of the operations of the requesting agencies at no cost to those agencies. The role of the board under this subsection shall be that of management consultant.

Adopt and amend regulations consistent with law, for its internal management and control of board programs.

Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of this chapter.

Establish jointly with the State Board of Education the minimum level of basic law enforcement training required of persons employed by school districts as school security guards, or school resource officers or in other positions that have the powers of a peace officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 539, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009); Laws, 2019, ch. 420, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 45-6-9.
Administrative and fiscal support provided by criminal justice planning commission.

The criminal justice planning commission shall provide administrative and fiscal support for the board on law enforcement officer standards and training, and the executive director of the commission shall serve as the director of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1981).

§ 45-6-11.
Law enforcement officer qualifications; recertification after leaving law enforcement; certification; reprimand, suspension or revocation of certification.

Law enforcement officers already serving under permanent appointment on July 1, 1981, and personnel of the Division of Community Services under Section 47-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, serving on July 1, 1994, shall not be required to meet any requirement of subsections (3) and (4) of this section as a condition of continued employment; nor shall failure of any such law enforcement officer to fulfill such requirements make that person ineligible for any promotional examination for which that person is otherwise eligible. Provided, however, if any law enforcement officer certified under the provisions of this chapter leaves his employment as such and does not become employed as a law enforcement officer within two (2) years from the date of termination of his prior employment, he shall be required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards in order to be employed as a law enforcement officer; except, that, if any law enforcement officer certified under this chapter leaves his employment as such to serve as a sheriff, he may be employed as a law enforcement officer after he has completed his service as a sheriff without being required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards. Part-time law enforcement officers serving on or before July 1, 1998, shall have until July 1, 2001, to obtain certification as a part-time officer.

Any person who has twenty (20) years of law enforcement experience and who is eligible to be certified under this section shall be eligible for recertification after leaving law enforcement on the same basis as someone who has taken the basic training course. Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 1993.

Any person who has twenty-five (25) years of law enforcement experience, whether as a part-time, full-time, reserve or auxiliary officer, and who has received certification as a part-time officer, may be certified as a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 45-6-3(c) without having to meet further requirements. Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 2009.

No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer unless that person has been certified as being qualified under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed one (1) year. No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed two (2) years. The prohibition against the appointment or employment of a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity for a period not to exceed one (1) year or a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity for a period not to exceed two (2) years may not be nullified by terminating the appointment or employment of such a person before the expiration of the time period and then rehiring the person for another period. Any person, who, due to illness or other events beyond his control, could not attend the required school or training as scheduled, may serve with full pay and benefits in such a capacity until he can attend the required school or training.

No person shall serve as a law enforcement officer in any full-time, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity during a period when that person’s certification has been suspended, cancelled or recalled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

In addition to the requirements of subsections (3), (7) and (8) of this section, the board, by rules and regulations consistent with other provisions of law, shall fix other qualifications for the employment of law enforcement officers, including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, good moral character, experience and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of law enforcement officers, and the board shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements. Additionally, the board shall fix qualifications for the appointment or employment of part-time law enforcement officers to essentially the same standards and requirements as law enforcement officers. The board shall develop and implement a part-time law enforcement officer training program that meets the same performance objectives and has essentially the same or similar content as the programs approved by the board for full-time law enforcement officers and the board shall provide that such training shall be available locally and held at times convenient to the persons required to receive such training.

Any elected sheriff, constable, deputy or chief of police may apply for certification. Such certification shall be granted at the request of the elected official after providing evidence of satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Certification granted to such elected officials shall be granted under the same standards and conditions as established by law enforcement officers and shall be subject to recall as in subsection (7) of this section.

The board shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the board for approved law enforcement officer education and training programs in this state, and has satisfactorily passed any and all diagnostic testing and evaluation as required by the board to ensure competency.

Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when:

The certificate was issued by administrative error;

The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud;

The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude;

The holder has been convicted of a felony;

The holder has committed an act of malfeasance or has been dismissed from his employing law enforcement agency; or

Other due cause as determined by the board.

When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in accordance with law prior to such reprimand, suspension or revocation.

Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board. Such appeals must be filed within thirty (30) days of the final order of the board.

Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to this chapter may reapply for certification, but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board cancelling such certification becomes final.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 434, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 516, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 539, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 45-6-13.
Reimbursement for attending training program; professional library.

The board shall establish, provide or maintain law enforcement training programs through such agencies and institutions as the board may deem appropriate.

The board shall authorize, but only from such funds authorized and appropriated by the Legislature, the reimbursement to each political subdivision and to state agencies of at least fifty percent (50%) of the allowable salary and allowable tuition, living and travel expense incurred by law enforcement officers in attendance at approved training programs, provided said political subdivisions and state agencies do in fact adhere to the selection and training standards established by the board. The board shall authorize, but only from such funds authorized and appropriated by the Legislature, the direct funding of a part-time law enforcement officer training program. The board shall require the payment of a reasonable tuition fee to aid in funding the costs of administering the part-time law enforcement officer training program.

The board is authorized to expend funds for the purpose of providing a professional library and training aids that will be available to state agencies and political subdivisions.

If any full- or part-time law enforcement officer in this state who is employed by a municipality, county or other governmental entity shall, within three (3) years after the date of his employment, resign from, or be terminated from, employment by such entity and immediately become employed by another governmental entity in a law enforcement capacity, then the governmental entity by which the resigned or terminated officer is employed shall reimburse the governmental entity from which the officer resigned or was terminated a proportionate share of the officer’s law enforcement training expenses which were incurred by such entity, if any.

The Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training shall reimburse each county for the expenses incurred by sheriffs and deputy sheriffs for attendance at approved training programs as provided in Section 25-3-25.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 323, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 45-6-15.
Law Enforcement Officers Training Fund; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

Such assessments as are collected under Section 99-19-73, Mississippi Code of 1972, and contributions, grants and other monies received by the board under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury and designated the “Law Enforcement Officers Training Fund,” which shall be expended by the board to defray the expenses of the program as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature.

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessments collected under Section 99-19-73, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be deposited into the “Jail Officer Training Account” which is hereby created in the “Law Enforcement Officers Training Fund.” The funds in such account shall be expended by the Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training to defray the expenses of the jail officers training program as authorized and appropriated by the Legislature.

Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund and account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned on the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

The board may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this chapter any and all donations, both real and personal property, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation.

Money authorized and appropriated by the Legislature shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration, which shall issue its warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers of the commission, in the manner provided by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 329, § 8; Laws, 1999, ch. 482, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 515, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 45-6-17.
Noncomplying officers and officers with certificates revoked or suspended not to exercise powers; salary not to be paid.

Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer who does not comply with the provisions of this chapter, or whose certificate has been suspended or revoked under provisions of this chapter, shall not be authorized to exercise the powers of law enforcement officers generally, and particularly shall not be authorized to exercise the power of arrest.

Any state agency or political subdivision that employs a person as a full- or part-time law enforcement officer who does not meet the requirements of this chapter, or who employs a person whose certificate has been suspended or revoked under provisions of this chapter, is prohibited from paying the salary of such person, or providing any public monies for the equipment or support of the law enforcement activities of such person and any person violating this subsection shall be personally liable for making such payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 474, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 415, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 394, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 45-6-19.
Continuing education requirement for municipal police chiefs and officers.

The chief of police of any municipality in the State of Mississippi is required to annually complete twenty (20) hours of executive level continuing education courses which are approved by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training. Any new chief of police having never previously served in that capacity, is required to complete forty (40) hours of executive level continuing education courses for his first year of service. Such education courses may be provided by an accredited law enforcement academy or by the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police.

Any police officer of any municipality in the State of Mississippi is required to annually complete a specified number of hours, as stated in this subsection, of continuing education courses which are approved by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training. The following number of hours of continuing education courses is required for municipal police officers based upon the number of years following July 1, 2004:

0-2 years after July 1, 2004. . . . .8 hours of annual training

3-4 years after July 1, 2004. . . . .16 hours of annual training

5 or more years after July 1, 2004. . . . .24 hours of annual training

Such education courses may be provided by an accredited law enforcement academy or by the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police.

The Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training shall reimburse each municipality for the expense incurred for chiefs of police and municipal police officers in attendance at approved training programs as required by this section.

Any chief of police or municipal police officer who fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to having his certification as a chief of police or municipal police officer revoked by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training, in accordance with Section 45-6-11.

The Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training is authorized to institute and promulgate all rules necessary for considering the revocation of any municipal chief of police or municipal police officer who does not comply with the provisions of this section, and may grant, for sufficient cause shown, an extension of time in which compliance with the provisions of this section may be made.

Any chief of police or municipal police officer who is aggrieved by any order or ruling made under the provisions of this section has the same rights and procedure of appeal as from any other order or ruling of the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 45-6-21.
Motorcycle Officers Training Program Fund created; funding of expenses of Motorcycle Officers Training Program; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Motorcycle Officers Training Program Fund, which shall be administered by the Office of the Attorney General. The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the training of state and local law enforcement officers, including, but not limited to, motorcycle officers training. All courses provided under the Motorcycle Officers Training Program shall be administered and approved by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers Association. Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Attorney General, upon appropriation by the Legislature. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the Motorcycle Officers Training Program;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73;

Monies received from the federal government;

Donations; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Motorcycle Officers Training Program shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 554, § 2; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).